Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2302
Legislative findings, declarations,
and intent.

The
Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) Nebraska's
law enforcement officers and firefighters place their lives at risk in the
line of duty to protect the citizens and property of this state;

(2) The services
performed by Nebraska law enforcement officers and firefighters are necessary
for the protection of the citizens and property of this state;

(3) Nebraska
law enforcement officers and firefighters have lost or may lose their lives
in the performance of their official duties; and

(4) Nebraska law enforcement
officers and firefighters perform dangerous and hazardous acts in order to
protect the citizens and property of this state.

It is the intent of the
Legislature to recognize the ultimate sacrifice made by Nebraska law enforcement
officers and firefighters who are killed in the line of duty on or after April
23, 2009, by providing a postsecondary educational benefit for their surviving
children to attend state universities, state colleges, and community colleges
located in Nebraska.

Laws 2009, LB206, § 2.